Utah statutes.
63G-9-301.   Audit and approval of claims -- Overexpenditure by agencies.

(1) (a)  The Board of Examiners shall audit any claim presented to it, if the settlement of the claim is required by law.

(b)  If the claim is approved, the board shall transmit it to the Legislature with a statement of the reasons for the approval.

(2)  When an agency's line item appropriation has been overexpended and a written report is submitted to the board as required by Section 63J-1-217, the board shall review the report and either:

(a)  recommend and submit to the Legislature any supplemental appropriations or corrective legislation that may be needed; or

(b)  recommend other internal procedures or policies that will make an overexpenditure in the future unlikely.

